Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GOODWILL EASTER SEALS MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Goodwill Easter Seals Minnesota and its partners. The grant shall be used to continue the FATHER Project in Rochester, Park Rapids, St. Cloud, St. Paul, Minneapolis, and the surrounding areas to assist fathers in overcoming barriers that prevent fathers from supporting their children economically and emotionally. new text end